Illinois, session 104th, HB2764.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Purpose. In recognition of the historical 5harms of systemic racism and overly punitive sentencing, as 6well as concerns to address mass incarceration and safely 7reduce the prison population, this Act is needed to ensure 8that persons are not serving excessive sentences with no 9public benefit. By utilizing and extending existing review 10mechanisms, this Act will reduce unnecessary incarceration, 11reduce costs of incarceration, provide incentive to people 12with long sentences to prepare for productive lives, make 13prisons safer for incarcerated persons and prison staff, and 14help bring the State in compliance with Section 11 of Article I 15of the Illinois Constitution, which mandates that all 16penalties aim to restore incarcerated people to useful 17citizenship. 18    Section 5. The Unified Code of Corrections is amended by 19changing Sections 3-3-3 and 3-5-1 and by adding Section 203-3-3.1 as follows: 21    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-3)  (from Ch. 38, par. 1003-3-3)22    Sec. 3-3-3. Eligibility for parole or release.   HB2764- 2 -LRB104 08590 RLC 18642 b1    (a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 3-3-3.1 and 2except Except for those offenders who accept the fixed release 3date established by the Prisoner Review Board under Section 43-3-2.1, every person serving a term of imprisonment under the 5law in effect prior to the effective date of this amendatory 6Act of 1977 shall be eligible for parole when he or she has 7served:8        (1) the minimum term of an indeterminate sentence less 9    time credit for good behavior, or 20 years less time 10    credit for good behavior, whichever is less; or11        (2) 20 years of a life sentence less time credit for 12    good behavior; or13        (3) 20 years or one-third of a determinate sentence, 14    whichever is less, less time credit for good behavior.15    (b) Except as otherwise provided in Section 3-3-3.1, no No 16person sentenced under this amendatory Act of 1977 or who 17accepts a release date under Section 3-3-2.1 shall be eligible 18for parole.19    (c) Except as otherwise provided in Section 3-3-3.1, and 20except Except for those sentenced to a term of natural life 21imprisonment, every person sentenced to imprisonment under 22this amendatory Act of 1977 or given a release date under 23Section 3-3-2.1 of this Act shall serve the full term of a 24determinate sentence less time credit for good behavior and 25shall then be released under the mandatory supervised release 26provisions of paragraph (d) of Section 5-8-1 of this Code.  HB2764- 3 -LRB104 08590 RLC 18642 b1    (d) (Blank). No person serving a term of natural life 2imprisonment may be paroled or released except through 3executive clemency.4    (e) Every person committed to the Department of Juvenile 5Justice under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 and confined in 6the State correctional institutions or facilities if such 7juvenile has not been tried as an adult shall be eligible for 8aftercare release under Section 3-2.5-85 of this Code. 9However, if a juvenile has been tried as an adult he or she 10shall only be eligible for parole or mandatory supervised 11release as an adult under this Section.12(Source: P.A. 98-558, eff. 1-1-14; 99-628, eff. 1-1-17.) 13    (730 ILCS 5/3-3-3.1 new)14    Sec. 3-3-3.1. Earned reentry; earned reentry hearings; 15sentences of 20 years or longer; life imprisonment; reentry.16    (a) Definition. "Earned reentry" means the termination of 17an incarcerated person's sentence that he or she is granted by 18the Prisoner Review Board as provided in this Act. If an 19incarcerated person is granted earned reentry, his or her 20sentence shall be considered complete after the term of 21mandatory supervised release. 22    (b) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in any 23provision of this Code, Article 122 of the Code of Criminal 24Procedure of 1963, or Article X or Section 2-1401 of the Code 25of Civil Procedure, a person serving terms of imprisonment,   HB2764- 4 -LRB104 08590 RLC 18642 b1including terms of natural life, in a Department of 2Corrections institution or facility is eligible for earned 3reentry under this Section if he or she has served terms of 4imprisonment specified in subsection (d). Hearings for earned 5reentry shall be administered by the Prisoner Review Board.6    (c) The Prisoner Review Board shall contact persons 7eligible for earned reentry and conduct hearings to determine 8whether they shall obtain earned reentry as provided by this 9Section and the Open Parole Hearings Act unless otherwise 10specified in this Section.11    (d) Implementation schedule. For the first year following 12the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 13Assembly, a person is eligible for earned reentry under this 14Section if he or she has served a term of imprisonment of at 15least 35 consecutive years. For the second year following the 16effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 17Assembly, a person is eligible for earned reentry under this 18Section if he or she has served a term of imprisonment of at 19least 25 consecutive years. For the third year following the 20effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 21Assembly and each year thereafter, a person is eligible for 22earned reentry under this Act if he or she has served a term of 23imprisonment of at least 20 consecutive years.24    (e) Victims and victims' families shall be notified in a 25timely manner and provided an opportunity to participate in 26the hearing in accordance with the Rights of Crime Victims and   HB2764- 5 -LRB104 08590 RLC 18642 b1Witnesses Act, the Open Parole Hearings Act, and this Article.2    (f) In determining whether a candidate should obtain 3earned reentry, the Prisoner Review Board shall consider the 4following factors:5        (1) a statement, oral or written, by the candidate as 6    to the reasons why he or she should obtain earned reentry;7        (2) any evidence of the candidate's rehabilitation 8    during the period of his or her incarceration, including 9    remorse for any criminal acts, if applicable;10        (3) any evidence of the likelihood that the candidate 11    will not recidivate;12        (4) any character references, letters of support from 13    family or community members, or references by staff, 14    volunteers, or incarcerated persons in the Department of 15    Corrections;16        (5) any evidence of the candidate's participation in 17    educational, vocational, substance abuse, behavior 18    modification, life skills, or reentry planning programs;19        (6) the candidate's disciplinary record while 20    incarcerated;21        (7) the candidate's employment history while 22    incarcerated;23        (8) the candidate's criminal history; and24        (9) the candidate's parole plan, including plans for 25    housing, employment, and community support upon release 26    from incarceration.  HB2764- 6 -LRB104 08590 RLC 18642 b1    (g) If the programs or employment opportunities described 2in this Section were not available to this candidate, the 3Board shall not penalize the candidate for failure to 4participate in them; nor shall the board penalize a candidate 5for choosing not to work for the Department of Corrections; 6nor shall the Board penalize a candidate for maintaining his 7or her claim of innocence.8    (h) Notification. The Prisoner Review Board shall notify 9all persons who become eligible for earned reentry under 10subsection (d) within 2 months of their becoming eligible and 11inform them that the Prisoner Review Board will consider them 12for earned reentry.13    (i) Hearings.14        (1) Hearings under this Section shall be conducted by 15    a panel of at least 3 members of the Board. A majority vote 16    of the members present and voting at the hearing is 17    required to grant the candidate earned reentry.18        (2) In the first 2 years following the effective date 19    of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, 20    hearings shall be held for each eligible person (who has 21    not deferred) within one year of the person becoming 22    eligible as specified in subsection (d). Beginning the 23    third year following the effective date of this amendatory 24    Act of the 104th General Assembly and every year 25    thereafter, hearings shall be held for each eligible 26    person (who has not deferred) within 8 months of the   HB2764- 7 -LRB104 08590 RLC 18642 b1    person becoming eligible as specified in subsection (d).2    (j) Deferrals. Any person who is notified of the person's 3eligibility for earned reentry under this Section may defer 4the person's eligibility for 2 years by notifying the Prisoner 5Review Board within 3 months of receiving notification of 6eligibility. 7    (k) If earned reentry is denied under this Section, the 8Board shall provide a written statement to the candidate that 9shall include the reasons for the denial, what the candidate 10must accomplish to attain earned reentry in the future, and 11when the candidate is eligible to reapply for earned reentry, 12which shall be no later than 2 years after the denial. The 13candidate may seek a continuance of up to 2 additional years.14    (l) An incarcerated person described in this Section may 15not be barred from any programming because his or her maximum 16out date is not in the near future.17    (m) Every incarcerated person described in this Section 18may bring legal counsel or an advocate of his or her choice to 19the earned reentry hearing.20    (n) Every incarcerated person described in this Section 21may attend and testify at his or her earned reentry hearing in 22person or by video-conference or may have counsel or an 23advocate read a statement.24    (o) Every incarcerated person described in this Section 25shall be provided full and complete access to his or her master 26record file, with the exception of the names of verified   HB2764- 8 -LRB104 08590 RLC 18642 b1confidential informants, at least 60 days prior to any earned 2reentry hearing.3    (p) This Section applies retroactively to every person 4currently serving a term of imprisonment in a Department of 5Corrections institution or facility, which is necessary in 6order to serve the important objectives listed in the 7preamble, including that of restoring incarcerated individuals 8to useful citizenship, as required by Section 11 of Article 1 9of the Illinois Constitution.10    (q) Nothing in this Section guarantees release. It only 11provides the opportunity for the incarcerated person to 12demonstrate his or her readiness to obtain earned reentry.13    (r) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to delay 14parole or mandatory supervised release consideration for 15petitioners who are or will be eligible for release earlier 16than this Section provides. Nothing in this Section shall be 17construed as a limit, substitution, or bar on a person's right 18to sentencing relief, or any other manner of relief, obtained 19by order of a court in proceedings other than as provided in 20this Section.  21    (730 ILCS 5/3-5-1)22    Sec. 3-5-1. Master record file. 23    (a) The Department of Corrections and the Department of 24Juvenile Justice shall maintain a master record file on each 25person committed to it, which shall contain the following   HB2764- 9 -LRB104 08590 RLC 18642 b1information:2        (1) all information from the committing court;3        (1.5) ethnic and racial background data collected in 4    accordance with Section 4.5 of the Criminal Identification 5    Act and Section 2-5 of the No Representation Without 6    Population Act; 7        (1.6) the committed person's last known complete 8    street address prior to incarceration or legal residence 9    collected in accordance with Section 2-5 of the No 10    Representation Without Population Act; 11        (2) reception summary;12        (3) evaluation and assignment reports and 13    recommendations;14        (4) reports as to program assignment and progress;15        (5) reports of disciplinary infractions and 16    disposition, including tickets and Administrative Review 17    Board action;18        (6) any parole or aftercare release plan;19        (7) any parole or aftercare release reports;20        (8) the date and circumstances of final discharge; 21        (9) criminal history;22        (10) current and past gang affiliations and ranks;23        (11) information regarding associations and family 24    relationships;25        (12) any grievances filed and responses to those 26    grievances;  HB2764- 10 -LRB104 08590 RLC 18642 b1        (13) other information that the respective Department 2    determines is relevant to the secure confinement and 3    rehabilitation of the committed person;4        (14) the last known address provided by the person 5    committed; and 6        (15) all medical and dental records. 7    (b) Except as otherwise provided in Section 3-3-3.1, all 8All files shall be confidential and access shall be limited to 9authorized personnel of the respective Department or by 10disclosure in accordance with a court order or subpoena. 11Personnel of other correctional, welfare or law enforcement 12agencies may have access to files under rules and regulations 13of the respective Department. The respective Department shall 14keep a record of all outside personnel who have access to 15files, the files reviewed, any file material copied, and the 16purpose of access. If the respective Department or the 17Prisoner Review Board makes a determination under this Code 18which affects the length of the period of confinement or 19commitment, the committed person and his counsel shall be 20advised of factual information relied upon by the respective 21Department or Board to make the determination, provided that 22the Department or Board shall not be required to advise a 23person committed to the Department of Juvenile Justice any 24such information which in the opinion of the Department of 25Juvenile Justice or Board would be detrimental to his 26treatment or rehabilitation.  HB2764- 11 -LRB104 08590 RLC 18642 b1    (c) The master file shall be maintained at a place 2convenient to its use by personnel of the respective 3Department in charge of the person. When custody of a person is 4transferred from the Department to another department or 5agency, a summary of the file shall be forwarded to the 6receiving agency with such other information required by law 7or requested by the agency under rules and regulations of the 8respective Department.9    (d) The master file of a person no longer in the custody of 10the respective Department shall be placed on inactive status 11and its use shall be restricted subject to rules and 12regulations of the Department.13    (e) All public agencies may make available to the 14respective Department on request any factual data not 15otherwise privileged as a matter of law in their possession in 16respect to individuals committed to the respective Department.17    (f) A committed person may request a summary of the 18committed person's master record file once per year and the 19committed person's attorney may request one summary of the 20committed person's master record file once per year. The 21Department shall create a form for requesting this summary, 22and shall make that form available to committed persons and to 23the public on its website. Upon receipt of the request form, 24the Department shall provide the summary within 15 days. The 25summary must contain, unless otherwise prohibited by law:26        (1) the person's name, ethnic, racial, last known   HB2764- 12 -LRB104 08590 RLC 18642 b1    street address prior to incarceration or legal residence, 2    and other identifying information;3        (2) all digitally available information from the 4    committing court;5        (3) all information in the Offender 360 system on the 6    person's criminal history;7        (4) the person's complete assignment history in the 8    Department of Corrections;9        (5) the person's disciplinary card;10        (6) additional records about up to 3 specific 11    disciplinary incidents as identified by the requester;12        (7) any available records about up to 5 specific 13    grievances filed by the person, as identified by the 14    requester; and15        (8) the records of all grievances filed on or after 16    January 1, 2023.17    Notwithstanding any provision of this subsection (f) to 18the contrary, a committed person's master record file is not 19subject to disclosure and copying under the Freedom of 20Information Act. 21    (g) Subject to appropriation, on or before July 1, 2025, 22the Department of Corrections shall digitalize all newly 23committed persons' master record files who become incarcerated 24and all other new information that the Department maintains 25concerning its correctional institutions, facilities, and 26individuals incarcerated.  HB2764- 13 -LRB104 08590 RLC 18642 b1    (h) Subject to appropriation, on or before July 1, 2027, 2the Department of Corrections shall digitalize all medical and 3dental records in the master record files and all other 4information that the Department maintains concerning its 5correctional institutions and facilities in relation to 6medical records, dental records, and medical and dental needs 7of committed persons.8    (i) Subject to appropriation, on or before July 1, 2029, 9the Department of Corrections shall digitalize all information 10in the master record files and all other information that the 11Department maintains concerning its correctional institutions 12and facilities.13    (j) The Department of Corrections shall adopt rules to 14implement subsections (g), (h), and (i) if appropriations are 15available to implement these provisions.16    (k) Subject to appropriation, the Department of 17Corrections, in consultation with the Department of Innovation 18and Technology, shall conduct a study on the best way to 19digitize all Department of Corrections records and the impact 20of that digitizing on State agencies, including the impact on 21the Department of Innovation and Technology. The study shall 22be completed on or before January 1, 2024. 23(Source: P.A. 102-776, eff. 1-1-23; 102-784, eff. 5-13-22; 24103-18, eff. 1-1-24; 103-71, eff. 6-9-23; 103-154, eff. 256-30-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)   HB2764- 14 -LRB104 08590 RLC 18642 b1    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 2severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect on 4January 1, 2026.